Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-376
Violations by licensee; action by borrower; damages; liability.

Any violation of section 45-372, in connection with any loan transaction, however acquired, shall not render the indebtedness, any interest, or other charges void or uncollectible. In an action, other than a class action, the borrower may recover from the licensee violating section 45-372 an award of liquidated damages in an amount determined by the court, but not less than five hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars. In any legal action brought pursuant to this section in which the licensee is found liable, the court shall award costs and reasonable attorney's fees to the borrower. A licensee is not liable under this section if the licensee notifies the borrower of an error before the licensee receives from the borrower written notice of the error or before the borrower has brought an action under this section and the licensee corrects the error within thirty days after notifying the borrower. A licensee may not be held liable in any action brought under this section if the licensee shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid the error.

Laws 2025, LB474, § 97.